Utah statutes.
78A-2-111.   Annual judicial conference.
(1)  There is established an annual judicial conference for all courts of this
state, to facilitate the exchange of ideas among all courts and judges, and to
study and improve the administration of the courts.
(2)  All elections provided in this act shall be conducted during the annual
judicial conference.
